Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3167.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA, THE CENTER FOR NURSING EQUITY AND EXCELLENCE.new text end new text begin $250,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $250,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota to establish, in collaboration with Minnesota State Colleges and Universities, a Center for Nursing Equity and Excellence to address nursing workforce needs, including pathways into nursing education, innovations in nursing education, simulation in nursing, nursing workforce equality across all regions of Minnesota, and the well-being and flourishing of student nurses and nurses in clinical and academic practice. new text end